Hawaii statutes.
§436E-6 Board of acupuncture. (a)
There shall be a board of acupuncture, the members of which shall be appointed
by the governor.

The board shall consist of five persons, two of
whom shall be private citizens and three shall be acupuncturists licensed in
accordance with this chapter.

(b) Commencing July 1, 1992, and thereafter,
each person appointed to the board shall have a four-year term and shall serve
not more than two consecutive terms. Members appointed to the board prior to
July 1, 1992, shall be permitted to continue to serve on the board until such
time when a maximum of eight consecutive years from the date of initial
appointment has been attained. [L 1985, c 214, pt of §1; am L 1992, c 8, §1 and
c 202, §22]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next